Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1507
False swearing; political party affiliation; penalty.

Any registered voter, candidate, or proposed candidate who swears falsely as to political party affiliation or swears that he or she affiliates with two or more political parties shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 406.